New York, session 2025-2026, S6341.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 1045-f of the public authorities 2 law, as added by chapter 513 of the laws of 1984, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 2. The water board shall consist of seven members [appointed by the 5 mayor] as follows: the borough president of each borough of the city of 6 New York, the mayor or a public member appointed by the mayor and a 7 public member appointed by the governor who has experience in the 8 science of water resource development. Terms of office of the members 9 shall be two years except that the terms of four of the board members 10 first appointed shall be one year. [At least one member shall have expe- 11 rience in the science of water resource development.] No member shall be 12 a director of the authority. The mayor shall appoint a [chairman] 13 chairperson from among the members of the board. All members shall 14 continue to hold office until their successors are appointed and quali- 15 fied. Vacancies shall be filled in the manner provided for original 16 appointments. Vacancies, occurring otherwise than by expiration of term 17 of office, shall be filled in the same manner as original appointments 18 for the unexpired terms. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03374-01-5